Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4081.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 30-221, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE30-221. Authority to issue revenue bonds A. When the authority finds other financing methods or procedure inadvisable, inadequate or insufficient to acquire or construct transmission lines, projects, works or facilities, it may independently or in conjunction with any other optional or alternative plans provided in this chapter issue bonds as provided by this article. END_STATUTE